Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 13. Transition Provisions.

§79-29-1301.
Applicability upon effective date.

On or after January 1, 2011, this chapter applies to:

A domestic limited liability company formed on or after January 1, 2011; and

A foreign limited liability company entity that is not registered with the Secretary of State to transact business in this state before January 1, 2011.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

§79-29-1303.
Early effectiveness of fees and annual reports.

On or after January 1, 2011, the fees required by Section 79-29-1203 apply to all filings made with the Secretary of State, including comparable filings under prior law, regardless of whether a limited liability company is subject to or has adopted this chapter.The intent of this section is to require a filing fee for all documents filed under either this chapter or the prior law without regard to the difference in designation of the document.

On or after January 1, 2011, Sections 79-29-215, 79-29-219, 79-29-821, 79-29-823, 79-29-825, 79-29-827 and 79-29-831, shall apply to all domestic limited liability companies formed before or after January 1, 2011, and Sections 79-29-215, 79-29-1021, 79-29-1023, 79-29-1025, 79-29-1027 and 79-29-1029 shall apply to all foreign limited liability companies registered with the Secretary of State before or after January 1, 2011.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

§79-29-1305.
Early adoption of this chapter by existing limited liability company.

A domestic limited liability company formed before January 1, 2011, may voluntarily elect to adopt and become subject to this chapter by:

Adopting the chapter by complying with the procedures for approval, under prior law and its organizational documents, of an amendment to its certificate of formation;

Amending any noncomplying organizational documents to comply with this chapter if any of its organizational documents, including its certificate of formation, do not comply with this chapter by complying with the procedures, under prior law and its organizational documents, to amend the noncomplying organizational documents to comply with this chapter, including filing with the Secretary of State in accordance with Section 79-29-203 a certificate of amendment to cause its certificate of formation to comply with this chapter; and

Filing with the Secretary of State in accordance with Section 79-29-203 a statement that the domestic limited liability company is electing to adopt this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

§79-29-1307.
Early adoption of chapter by registered foreign limited liability company.

A foreign limited liability company registered with the Secretary of State to transact business in this state before January 1, 2011, may voluntarily elect to adopt and become subject to this chapter by filing with the Secretary of State in accordance with Section 79-29-203:

A statement that the foreign limited liability company is electing to adopt this chapter; and

An amendment to its registration of foreign limited liability company that would cause its certificate of registration of foreign limited liability company to comply with this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

§79-29-1309.
Applicability to existing limited liability companies.

On or after January 1, 2012, such date referred to in this article as the “mandatory application date,” if a domestic limited liability company formed before January 1, 2011, or a foreign limited liability company registered with the Secretary of State to transact business in this state before January 1, 2011, has not taken the actions specified by Section 79-29-1305 or 79-29-1307 to elect to adopt this chapter:

This chapter applies to the domestic or foreign limited liability company and all actions taken by the managers, officers, or members of the limited liability company, except as otherwise expressly provided by this article;

A domestic or foreign limited liability company shall not be considered to have failed to comply with this chapter if the entity’s certificate of formation or application for registration of foreign limited liability company, as appropriate, does not comply with the chapter;

A domestic limited liability company shall conform its certificate of formation to the requirements of this chapter when it next files an amendment to its certificate of formation; and

A foreign limited liability company shall conform its registration of foreign limited liability company to the requirements of this chapter when it next files an amendment to its registration of foreign limited liability company.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

§79-29-1311.
Applicability to certain acts, contracts, and transactions.

All of the provisions of this chapter govern the acts, contracts, or other transactions by a limited liability company subject to Section 79-29-1301 or by its managers, members or officers that occur on or after January 1, 2011. Unless the limited liability company that is formed or registered before January 1, 2011, has elected to be subject to the Revised Act prior to the mandatory application date the prior law governs the acts, contracts, or transactions of the limited liability company that is formed or registered before January 1, 2011, or its managers, members or officers that occur before the mandatory application date.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

§79-29-1313.
Indemnification.

Section 79-29-123 governs any proposed indemnification by a limited liability company after the mandatory application date, regardless of whether the events on which the indemnification is based occurred before or after the mandatory application date.In a case in which indemnification is permitted but not required under Section 79-29-123, a provision relating to indemnification contained in the organizational documents of a limited liability company on the mandatory application date that would otherwise have the effect of limiting the nature or type of indemnification permitted by Section 79-29-123 may not be construed after the mandatory application date as limiting the indemnification authorized by Section 79-29-123 unless the provision so intended to limit or restrict permissive indemnification under applicable law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

Chapter 29 of Title 79 has been set out twice. This chapter is effective from and after January 1, 2011. For the chapter as effective until January 1, 2011, see the preceding chapter, also numbered Chapter 29.

§79-29-1315.
Dissolution.

Section 79-29-803 applies to an action for judicial dissolution commenced after the mandatory application date; or

Section 79-29-801 applies to a voluntary dissolution initiated after the mandatory application date.

The prior law governs:

An action described by subsection (1)(a) of this section that is pending on the mandatory application date; or

A proceeding described by subsection (1)(b) of this section initiated before the mandatory application date.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

§79-29-1317.
Maintenance of prior action.

Except as expressly provided by this article, this chapter does not apply to an action or proceeding commenced before the mandatory application date.Prior law applies to the action or proceeding.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.